Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1225
United States Government vessel identification numbering system; effect.

In the event that an agency of the United States Government shall have in force an overall system of identification numbering for vessels within the United States, the commission may by rules and regulations adopt such numbering system as the numbering system pursuant to the State Boat Act.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 113.